Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-215
Conservation, defined.

Conservation means the use of all methods and procedures for the purpose of increasing the number of individuals within species and populations of wildlife up to the optimum carrying capacity of their habitat and maintaining such levels. Such methods and procedures include, but are not limited to, all activities associated with scientific resources management such as research, census, law enforcement, habitat acquisition and maintenance, propagation, live trapping, transplantation, regulated taking, and the periodic or total protection of species or populations.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 25.